Washington statutes.
RCW 18.180.040

Collection of costs of service—Application.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is otherwise entitled to collect the costs of service of process shall not be entitled to collect those costs if the person does not use a process server who under this chapter either is required to register or is exempt from the registration requirement.

(2) The person may collect the costs of the service of process if the process server registers within forty-five days after serving the process.

(3) This section shall apply to all process served on or after August 1, 1992.

[ 1992 c 125 s 5.]